Missouri, session 2026, HB2128.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 301.130 and 301.147, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 301.130 and 301.147, to read as follows:
301.130. 1. The director of revenue, upon receipt of a proper application for
registration, required fees and any other information which may be required by law, shall
issue to the applicant a certificate of registration in such manner and form as the director of
revenue may prescribe and a set of license plates, or other evidence of registration, as
provided by this section. Each set of license plates shall bear the name or abbreviated name
of this state, the words "SHOW-ME STATE", the month and year in which the registration
shall expire, and an arrangement of numbers or letters, or both, as shall be assigned from year
to year by the director of revenue. The plates shall also contain fully reflective material with
a common color scheme and design for each type of license plate issued pursuant to this
chapter. The plates shall be clearly visible at night, and shall be aesthetically attractive.
Special plates for qualified disabled veterans will have the "DISABLED VETERAN"
wording on the license plates in preference to the words "SHOW-ME STATE" and special
plates for members of the National Guard will have the "NATIONAL GUARD" wording in
preference to the words "SHOW-ME STATE".
2. The arrangement of letters and numbers of license plates shall be uniform
throughout each classification of registration. The director may provide for the arrangement
of the numbers in groups or otherwise, and for other distinguishing marks on the plates.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2128 2
3. All property-carrying commercial motor vehicles to be registered at a gross weight
in excess of twelve thousand pounds, all passenger-carrying commercial motor vehicles, local
transit buses, school buses, trailers, semitrailers, motorcycles, motortricycles, autocycles,
motorscooters, and driveaway vehicles shall be registered with the director of revenue as
provided for in subsection 3 of section 301.030, or with the state highways and transportation
commission as otherwise provided in this chapter, but only one license plate shall be issued
for each such vehicle, except as provided in this subsection. The applicant for registration of
any property-carrying commercial vehicle registered at a gross weight in excess of twelve
thousand pounds may request and be issued two license plates for such vehicle, and if such
plates are issued, the director of revenue shall provide for distinguishing marks on the plates
indicating one plate is for the front and the other is for the rear of such vehicle. The director
may assess and collect an additional charge from the applicant in an amount not to exceed the
fee prescribed for personalized license plates in subsection 1 of section 301.144.
4. The plates issued to manufacturers and dealers shall bear the letters and numbers as
prescribed by section 301.560, and the director may place upon the plates other letters or
marks to distinguish commercial motor vehicles and trailers and other types of motor
vehicles.
5. No motor vehicle or trailer shall be operated on any highway of this state unless it
shall have displayed thereon the license plate or set of license plates issued by the director of
revenue or the state highways and transportation commission and authorized by section
301.140. Each such plate shall be securely fastened to the motor vehicle or trailer in a manner
so that all parts thereof shall be plainly visible and reasonably clean so that the reflective
qualities thereof are not impaired. Each such plate may be encased in a transparent cover so
long as the plate is plainly visible and its reflective qualities are not impaired. License plates
shall be fastened to all motor vehicles except trucks, tractors, truck tractors or truck-tractors
licensed in excess of twelve thousand pounds on the front and rear of such vehicles not less
than eight nor more than forty-eight inches above the ground, with the letters and numbers
thereon right side up. The license plates on trailers, motorcycles, motortricycles, autocycles,
and motorscooters shall be displayed on the rear of such vehicles either horizontally or
vertically, with the letters and numbers plainly visible. The license plate on buses, other than
school buses, and on trucks, tractors, truck tractors or truck-tractors licensed in excess of
twelve thousand pounds shall be displayed on the front of such vehicles not less than eight
nor more than forty-eight inches above the ground, with the letters and numbers thereon right
side up or if two plates are issued for the vehicle pursuant to subsection 3 of this section,
displayed in the same manner on the front and rear of such vehicles. The license plate or
plates authorized by section 301.140, when properly attached, shall be prima facie evidence
that the required fees have been paid.

HB 2128 3
6. (1) The director of revenue shall issue annually or biennially a tab or set of tabs as
provided by law as evidence of the annual payment of registration fees and the current
registration of a vehicle in lieu of the set of plates. Beginning January 1, 2010, the director
may prescribe any additional information recorded on the tab or tabs to ensure that the tab or
tabs positively correlate with the license plate or plates issued by the department of revenue
for such vehicle. Such tabs shall be produced in each license bureau office.
(2) The vehicle owner to whom a tab or set of tabs is issued shall affix and display
such tab or tabs in the designated area of the license plate, no more than one per plate.
(3) A tab or set of tabs issued by the director of revenue when attached to a vehicle in
the prescribed manner shall be prima facie evidence that the registration fee for such vehicle
has been paid.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the director of revenue shall issue
plates for a period of at least six years.
(5) For those commercial motor vehicles and trailers registered pursuant to section
301.041, the plate issued by the highways and transportation commission shall be a
permanent nonexpiring license plate for which no tabs shall be issued. Nothing in this section
shall relieve the owner of any vehicle permanently registered pursuant to this section from the
obligation to pay the annual registration fee due for the vehicle. The permanent nonexpiring
license plate shall be returned to the highways and transportation commission upon the sale or
disposal of the vehicle by the owner to whom the permanent nonexpiring license plate is
issued, or the plate may be transferred to a replacement commercial motor vehicle when the
owner files a supplemental application with the Missouri highways and transportation
commission for the registration of such replacement commercial motor vehicle. Upon
payment of the annual registration fee, the highways and transportation commission shall
issue a certificate of registration or other suitable evidence of payment of the annual fee, and
such evidence of payment shall be carried at all times in the vehicle for which it is issued.
(6) Upon the sale or disposal of any vehicle permanently registered under this section,
or upon the termination of a lease of any such vehicle, the permanent nonexpiring plate issued
for such vehicle shall be returned to the highways and transportation commission and shall
not be valid for operation of such vehicle, or the plate may be transferred to a replacement
vehicle when the owner files a supplemental application with the Missouri highways and
transportation commission for the registration of such replacement vehicle. If a vehicle which
is permanently registered under this section is sold, wrecked or otherwise disposed of, or the
lease terminated, the registrant shall be given credit for any unused portion of the annual
registration fee when the vehicle is replaced by the purchase or lease of another vehicle
during the registration year.

HB 2128 4
7. Beginning January 1, 2027, the director of revenue may issue five-year tabs as
provided by law as evidence of the payment of registration fees and the current
registration of a vehicle in lieu of the set of plates to motor vehicle owners electing a five-
year registration under subsection 2 of section 301.147.
8. The director of revenue and the highways and transportation commission may
prescribe rules and regulations for the effective administration of this section. No rule or
portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of this section shall become effective unless
it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section 536.024.
[8.] 9. Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, owners of
100 motor vehicles other than apportioned motor vehicles or commercial motor vehicles licensed
101 in excess of twenty-four thousand pounds gross weight may apply for special personalized
102 license plates. Vehicles licensed for twenty-four thousand pounds that display special
103 personalized license plates shall be subject to the provisions of subsections 1 and 2 of section
104 301.030. On and after August 28, 2016, owners of motor vehicles, other than apportioned
105 motor vehicles or commercial motor vehicles licensed in excess of twenty-four thousand
106 pounds gross weight, may apply for any preexisting or hereafter statutorily created special
107 personalized license plates.
108 [9.] 10. No later than January 1, 2019, the director of revenue shall commence the
109 reissuance of new license plates of such design as approved by the advisory committee under
110 section 301.125 consistent with the terms, conditions, and provisions of section 301.125 and
111 this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this section, in addition to all other fees
112 required by law, applicants for registration of vehicles with license plates that expire during
113 the period of reissuance, applicants for registration of trailers or semitrailers with license
114 plates that expire during the period of reissuance and applicants for registration of vehicles
115 that are to be issued new license plates during the period of reissuance shall pay the cost of
116 the plates required by this subsection. The additional cost prescribed in this subsection shall
117 not be charged to persons receiving special license plates issued under section 301.073 or
118 301.443. Historic motor vehicle license plates registered pursuant to section 301.131 and
119 specialized license plates are exempt from the provisions of this subsection. Except for new,
120 replacement, and transfer applications, permanent nonexpiring license plates issued to
121 commercial motor vehicles and trailers registered under section 301.041 are exempt from the
122 provisions of this subsection.
301.147. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 301.020 to the contrary,
beginning July 1, 2000, the director of revenue may provide owners of motor vehicles, other
than commercial motor vehicles licensed in excess of fifty-four thousand pounds gross
weight, the option of biennially registering motor vehicles[. Any vehicle manufactured as an
even-numbered model year vehicle shall be renewed each even-numbered calendar year and

HB 2128 5
any such vehicle manufactured as an odd-numbered model year vehicle shall be renewed each
odd-numbered calendar year], subject to the following requirements:
(1) The fee collected at the time of biennial registration shall include the annual
registration fee plus a pro rata amount for the additional twelve months of the biennial
registration;
(2) Presentation of all documentation otherwise required by law for vehicle
registration including, but not limited to, a personal property tax receipt or certified statement
for the preceding year that no such taxes were due as set forth in section 301.025, proof of a
motor vehicle safety inspection and any applicable emission inspection conducted within
sixty days prior to the date of application and proof of insurance as required by section
303.026.
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 301.020 to the contrary, beginning
January 1, 2027, the director of revenue may provide owners of motor vehicles with a
model year of manufacture that is less than six years old, other than commercial motor
vehicles licensed in excess of fifty-four thousand pounds gross weight, the option of a
five-year registration period, subject to the following requirements:
(1) The fee collected at the time of five-year registration shall include the annual
registration fee plus a pro rata amount for the additional four years of the five-year
registration;
(2) Presentation of all documentation otherwise required by law for vehicle
registration including, but not limited to, a personal property tax receipt or certified
statement for the preceding year that no such taxes were due as set forth in section
301.025, proof of a motor vehicle safety inspection if applicable, and proof of insurance
as required by section 303.026.
3. The director of revenue may prescribe rules and regulations for the effective
administration of this section. The director is authorized to adopt those rules that are
reasonable and necessary to accomplish the limited duties specifically delegated within this
section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
promulgated pursuant to the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if
it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of chapter 536. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to
chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule
proposed or adopted after July 1, 2000, shall be invalid and void.
[3.] 4. The director of revenue shall have the authority to stagger the registration
period of motor vehicles other than commercial motor vehicles licensed in excess of twelve
thousand pounds gross weight. Once the owner of a motor vehicle chooses the option of

HB 2128 6
biennial registration, such registration must be maintained for the full twenty-four month
period.
✔